Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 6
TERMINATION OF THE PARENT-CHILD
LEGAL RELATIONSHIP

Law reviews:
For article, "Difficult Issues in Adoption - Part 1", see 24

C
olo. Law. 851 (1994); for article, "Difficult Issues in Adoption - Part 2", see 24

C
olo. Law. 1083 (1994).

19-3-601. Short title.

This part 6 shall be known and may be cited as the "Parent-Child Legal Relationship Termination Act of 1987".

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 787, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-101 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-602. Motion for termination - separate hearing - right to counsel - no jury trial - repeal.

Termination of a parent-child legal relationship shall be considered only after the filing of a written motion alleging the factual grounds for termination, and termination of a parent-child legal relationship shall be considered at a separate hearing
following an adjudication of a child as dependent or neglected. Such motion shall be filed at least thirty days before such hearing. In a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child is under six years of age at
the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the court shall hear the motion for termination within one hundred twenty days after such motion is filed, and shall not grant a delay unless good cause is shown
and unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting a delay in accordance with the requirements of section 19-3-104.

(1.5) (a) Pursuant to the provisions of section 19-1-126, the motion for termination shall:

Include a statement indicating what continuing inquiries the county department of social services has made in determining whether the child who is the subject of the termination proceeding is an Indian child;

(I.5) Include a statement indicating that a grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, or sister of the child must file a request for guardianship and legal custody of the child within twenty days of the filing of the motion;

Identify whether the child is an Indian child; and

Include the identity of the Indian child's tribe, if the child is identified as an Indian child.

If notices were sent to the parent or Indian custodian of the child and to the Indian child's tribe, pursuant to section 19-1-126, the postal receipts, or copies thereof, shall be attached to the motion for termination and filed with the court or filed
within ten days after the filing of the motion for termination, as specified in section 19-1-126 (1)(c).

After a motion for termination of a parent-child legal relationship is filed pursuant to this part 6, the parent or parents shall be advised of the right to counsel if not already represented by counsel of record; and counsel shall be appointed in accordance
with the provisions of section 19-1-105. The parent or parents shall also be advised that a grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, or sister of the child must file a request for guardianship and legal custody of the child within twenty
days of the filing of the motion. Advisement of right to counsel and the time for a relative to file a request may be done in open court or in a writing served as provided by law for motions and notices in a proceeding under section
19-1-104 (1)(b).

A guardian ad litem, who shall be an attorney and who shall be the child's previously appointed guardian ad litem whenever possible, shall be appointed to represent the child's best interests in any hearing determining the involuntary termination of the
parent-child legal relationship. Additionally, said attorney shall be experienced, whenever possible, in juvenile law. Such representation shall continue until an appropriate permanent placement of the child is effected
or until the court's jurisdiction is terminated. If a respondent parent is a minor, a guardian ad litem shall be appointed and shall serve in addition to any counsel requested by the parent.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective January 9, 2023.

There shall be no right to a jury trial at proceedings held to consider the termination of a parent-child legal relationship.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 788, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2002:
(1.5) added, p. 787, § 7, effective May 30.

L. 2003:
(1) amended, p. 1226, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:
(1.5)(a)(I.5) added and (2) amended pp. 94, 93, §§ 3, 2, effective March 31.

L. 2022:
(3)(b) added by revision, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, pp. 437, 446, §§ 11, 37.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-103 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92,
Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-603. Notice - abandonment.

Before a termination of the parent-child legal relationship based on abandonment can be ordered, the petitioner shall file, only if the location of a parent remains unknown, an affidavit stating what efforts have been made to locate the parent or parents
of the child subject to the motion for termination. Such affidavit shall be filed not later than ten days prior to the hearing.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 788, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 521, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-104 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-604. Criteria for termination.

The court may order a termination of the parent-child legal relationship upon the finding by clear and convincing evidence of any one of the following:

That the child has been adjudicated dependent or neglected and has been abandoned by the child's parent or parents as follows:

That the parent or parents have surrendered physical custody of the child for a period of six months or more and have not manifested during such period the firm intention to resume physical custody of the child or to make permanent legal arrangements
for the care of the child except in cases when voluntary placement is renewable under section 19-1-115 (8)(a);

That the identity of the parent of the child is unknown and has been unknown for three months or more and that reasonable efforts to identify and locate the parent in accordance with section 19-3-603 have failed;

That the child is adjudicated dependent or neglected and the court finds that an appropriate treatment plan cannot be devised to address the unfitness of the parent or parents. In making such a determination, the court shall find one of the following
as the basis for unfitness:

An emotional illness, a behavioral or mental health disorder, or an intellectual and developmental disability of the parent of such duration or nature as to render the parent unlikely within a reasonable time to care for the ongoing physical, mental,
and emotional needs and conditions of the child. The court shall make findings that the provision of reasonable accommodations and modifications pursuant to the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990",
42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., and its related amendments and implementing regulations, will not remediate the impact of the parent's disability on the health or welfare of the child.

A single incident resulting in serious bodily injury or disfigurement of the child;

Long-term confinement of the parent of such duration that the parent is not eligible for parole for at least six years after the date the child was adjudicated dependent or neglected or, in a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child
is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the long-term confinement of the parent of such duration that the parent is not eligible for parole for at least
thirty-six months after the date the child was adjudicated dependent or neglected and the court has found by clear and convincing evidence that no appropriate treatment plan can be devised to address the unfitness
of the parent or parents;

Serious bodily injury or death of a sibling due to proven parental abuse or neglect;

An identifiable pattern of habitual abuse to which the child or another child has been subjected and, as a result of which, a court has adjudicated another child as neglected or dependent based upon allegations of sexual or physical abuse, or a court
of competent jurisdiction has determined that such abuse has caused the death of another child;

An identifiable pattern of sexual abuse of the child; or

The torture of or extreme cruelty to the child, a sibling of the child, or another child of either parent;

That the child is adjudicated dependent or neglected and all of the following exist:

That an appropriate treatment plan approved by the court has not been reasonably complied with by the parent or parents or has not been successful or that the court has previously found, pursuant to section 19-3-508 (1)(e), that an appropriate treatment
plan could not be devised. In a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if a child is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), no parent or parents
shall be found to be in reasonable compliance with or to have been successful at a court-approved treatment plan when:

The parent has not attended visitations with the child as set forth in the treatment plan, unless good cause can be shown for failing to visit; or

The parent exhibits the same problems addressed in the treatment plan without adequate improvement, including but not limited to improvement in the relationship with the child, and is unable or unwilling to provide nurturing and safe parenting sufficiently
adequate to meet the child's physical, emotional, and mental health needs and conditions despite earlier intervention and treatment for the family. The court may receive testimony regarding the family's
progress under the treatment plan from the child's physician or therapist, foster parent, educational or religious teachers, CASA volunteer, or caseworker.

That the parent is unfit; and

That the conduct or condition of the parent or parents is unlikely to change within a reasonable time.

In determining unfitness, conduct, or condition for purposes of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, the court shall find that continuation of the legal relationship between parent and child is likely to result in grave risk of death or serious
bodily injury to the child or that the conduct or condition of the parent or parents renders the parent or parents unable or unwilling to give the child reasonable parental care to include, at a minimum, nurturing and safe parenting
sufficiently adequate to meet the child's physical, emotional, and mental health needs and conditions. In making such determinations, the court shall consider, but not be limited to, the following:

Any one of the bases for a finding of parental unfitness set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section;

Conduct towards the child of a physically or sexually abusive nature;

History of violent behavior;

A single incident of life-threatening or serious bodily injury or disfigurement of the child;

Excessive use of intoxicating liquors or controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., which affects the ability to care and provide for the child;

Neglect of the child;

Injury or death of a sibling due to proven parental abuse or neglect, murder, voluntary manslaughter, or circumstances in which a parent aided, abetted, or attempted the commission of or conspired or solicited to commit murder of a child's sibling;

Reasonable efforts by child-caring agencies which have been unable to rehabilitate the parent or parents;

That any parent who is a named respondent in the termination proceeding has had prior involvement with the department of human services concerning an incident of abuse or neglect involving the child and a subsequent incident of abuse or neglect occurs;

Whether a parent committed felony assault that resulted in serious bodily injury to the child or to another child of the parent;

That the child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the county department for fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, unless:

The child is placed with a relative of the child;

The county department or a state agency has documented in the case plan, which shall be available for court review, that filing such a motion would not be in the best interests of the child;

Where required to make reasonable efforts, services identified as necessary for the safe return of the child to the child's home have not been provided to the family consistent with the time period in the case plan; or

The child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the county department for such period of time due to circumstances beyond the control of the parent such as incarceration of the parent for a reasonable period of time, court delays or continuances
that are not attributable to the parent, or such other reasonable circumstances that the court finds are beyond the control of the parent;

Whether, on two or more occasions, a child in the physical custody of the parent has been adjudicated dependent or neglected in a proceeding under this article or comparable proceedings under the laws of another state or the federal government;

Whether, on one or more prior occasions, a parent has had his or her parent-child legal relationship terminated pursuant to this article or section 19-5-105 or comparable proceedings under the laws of another state or the federal government.

In considering the termination of the parent-child legal relationship, the court shall give primary consideration to the physical, mental, and emotional conditions and needs of the child. The court shall review and order, if necessary, an evaluation of
the child's physical, mental, and emotional conditions. For the purpose of determining termination of the parent-child legal relationship, written reports and other materials relating to the child's mental, physical, and social
history may be received and considered by the court along with other evidence; but the court, if so requested by the child, his parent or guardian, or any other interested party, shall require that the person who wrote the report
or prepared the material appear as a witness and be subject to both direct and cross-examination. In the absence of such request, the court may order the person who prepared the report or other material to appear if it finds that
the interest of the child so requires.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 788, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
(1)(a) amended, p. 1037, § 5, effective April 3.

L. 91:
(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1159, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 92:
(3) amended, p. 224, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1) and IP(2) amended and (2)(i) added, p. 2055, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 97:
IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, p. 521, § 10, effective July 1; (1)(b) amended, p. 1440, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(1)(b), IP(2), (2)(d), and (2)(g) amended and (2)(j) and (2)(k) added, pp. 1419, 1420, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001:
(2)(l) and (2)(m) added, p. 499, § 1, effective May 4; (1)(b)(V) and (1)(b)(VI) amended and (1)(b)(VII) added, p. 847, § 10, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(1)(c)(I)(B) amended, p. 754, § 6, effective March 25.

L. 2008:
(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1894, § 67, effective August 5.

L. 2012:
(2)(e) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1625, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 2017:
(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 17-1046), ch. 50, p. 158, § 10, effective March 16; (1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1318, § 167, effective May 25.

L. 2018:
IP(1)(b) and (1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1135, § 8, effective April 25.

19-3-605. Request for placement with family members.

Following an order of termination of the parent-child legal relationship, the court shall consider, but shall not be bound by, a request that guardianship and legal custody of the child be placed with a relative of the child. When ordering guardianship
of the person and legal custody of the child, the court may give preference to a grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, sister, half-sibling, or first cousin of the child when such relative has made a timely request therefor pursuant
to the requirement of this subsection (1) and the court determines that such placement is in the best interests of the child. Such request must be submitted to the court no later than twenty days after the motion for termination
is filed pursuant to section 19-3-602. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the child placement agency with physical custody of the child to notify said relatives described in this section of the pending termination
of parental rights.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, when the child is part of a sibling group and the sibling group is being placed out of the home, if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available
joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, the court shall presume that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted
by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

In making placement determinations concerning a child following the order of termination of the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to the provisions of this section, the court shall consider all pertinent information related to modifying the placement
of the child prior to removing the child from his or her placement, including the following:

An individualized assessment of the child's needs created pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended;

Whether the child's placement at the time of the hearing is a safe and potentially permanent placement for the child, including documentation that a county department or a licensed child placement agency has adequately screened the family member who is
seeking to care for the child and any adult residing in the home and that all of the criminal history record checks and other background checks have been completed as required pursuant to section 26-6-910 or 19-3-407;

The child's actual age and developmental stage and, in consideration of this information, the child's attachment needs;

Whether the child has significant psychological ties to a person who could provide a permanent placement for the child, including a relative, and, if so, whether this person maintained contact with the child during the child's placement out of the home;

Whether a person who could provide a permanent placement for the child is willing to maintain appropriate contact after an adoption of the child with the child's relatives, particularly sibling relatives, when such contact is safe, reasonable, and appropriate;

Whether a person who could provide a permanent placement for the child is aware of the child's culture and willing to provide the child with positive ties to his or her culture;

The child's medical, physical, emotional, or other specific needs, and whether a person who could provide a permanent placement for the child is able to meet the child's needs; and

The child's attachment to the child's caregiver at the time of the hearing and the possible effects on the child's emotional well-being if the child is removed from the caregiver's home.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 789, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2003:
Entire section amended, p. 2626, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 2005:
(1) amended, p. 93, § 1, effective March 31; entire section amended, p. 678, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:
(3)(b) amended, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1019, § 12, effective June 2; (3) amended, (HB 15-1337), ch. 328, p. 1342, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2022:
(3)(b) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 836, § 41, effective July 1.

19-3-606. Review of child's disposition following termination of the parent-child legal relationship.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The court, at the conclusion of a hearing in which it ordered the termination of a parent-child legal relationship, shall order that a review hearing be held not later
than ninety days following the date of the termination. At such hearing the agency or individual vested with custody of the child shall report to the court what disposition of the child, if any, has occurred, and the guardian ad
litem shall submit a written report with recommendations to the court, based upon an independent investigation, for the best disposition of the child. Any report required under this subsection (1) shall be subject to the provisions
of section 19-1-309.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The court, at the conclusion of a hearing in which it ordered the termination of a parent-child legal relationship, shall order that a review hearing be held not later than ninety days after the date of the termination.
At such hearing, the agency or individual vested with custody of the child shall report to the court what disposition of the child, if any, has occurred. The guardian ad litem shall provide a written report stating the guardian
ad litem's position to the court based upon an independent investigation and consultation with the child regarding the disposition that is in the best interests of the child and the necessary steps to finalize the child's permanency.
Counsel for youth shall provide a position statement that conveys the child's position and objectives for the child's desired disposition and necessary steps to finalize permanency. Any report required pursuant to this subsection
(1) is subject to the provisions of section 19-1-309.

If no adoption has taken place within a reasonable time and the court determines that adoption is not immediately feasible or appropriate, the court may order that provision be made immediately for alternative long-term placement of the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 790, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) amended, p. 944, § 5, effective March 27.

L. 90:
(1) amended, p. 1012, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2022:
(1) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 437, § 12, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-607. Expert testimony.

An indigent parent has the right to have appointed one expert witness of his or her own choosing whose reasonable fees and expenses, subject to the review and approval by the office of the respondent parents' counsel, shall be paid by the state of Colorado
pursuant to section 19-3-610.

All ordered evaluations shall be made available to counsel at least fifteen days prior to the hearing.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 790, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2016:
(1) amended, (SB 16-205), ch. 216, p. 830, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-107 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-608. Effect of decree.

An order for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship divests the child and the parent of all legal rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations with respect to each other, but it shall not modify the child's status as
an heir at law which shall cease only upon a final decree of adoption.

No order or decree entered pursuant to this part 6 shall disentitle a child to any benefit due him from any third person, including, but not limited to, any Indian tribe, any agency, any state, or the United States.

After the termination of a parent-child legal relationship, the former parent is not entitled to any notice of proceedings for the adoption of the child by another, nor has he any right to object to the adoption or to otherwise participate in such proceedings.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 790, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-108 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-609. Appeals - time requirements.

Appeals of court decrees made under this part 6 shall be given precedence on the calendar of the appellate court over all other matters unless otherwise provided by law.

Whenever an appeal is made under this part 6, an indigent parent, upon request, shall be provided a transcript of the trial proceeding for the appeal at the expense of the state pursuant to section 19-3-610.

All written orders by the district court from any appealable hearing must be made within thirty-five days after the hearing to provide timely permanency for the child or children who are the subject of the appeal.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 790, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3) added, (HB 22-1113), ch. 56, p. 261, § 3, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-109 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1113, see section 1 of chapter 56, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-610. Budgetary allocation for expenses.

The general assembly shall make annual appropriations to the office of the respondent parents' counsel for the purpose of meeting the expenses of sections 19-3-607 (1) and 19-3-609 (2).

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 791, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2016:
Entire section amended, (SB 16-205), ch. 216, p. 830, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-11-110 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-611. Review of decisions regarding placement of children. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:
Entire section added, p. 755, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 91:
Entire section repealed, p. 883, § 1, effective June 5.